North Dakota, session 69, HB1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 4.1-07-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
5. "Producer" means any person that:
a. Plants or causes to be planted a dry pea and lentil crop in which the person has an
ownership interest, with the intent that upon maturity the crop will be harvested; or
b. Will have met the requirements of subdivision a during the next available growing
season; or
c. Has met the requirements of subdivision a during the immediately preceding growing
seasonplanted and subsequently will plant a dry pea and lentil crop as part of the
person's crop rotation within a six - year period .

H. B. NO. 1103 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1103.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State